netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="ma_u">
        <e><p><l>u</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_u">
        <e><p><l></l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_F">
        <e><p><l>F</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_M">
        <e><p><l>M</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_W">
        <e><p><l>W</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_N">
        <e><p><l>N</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_n">
        <e><p><l>n</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_nh">
        <e><p><l></l><r>nh</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_m">
        <e><p><l>m</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_y">
        <e><p><l>y</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="md_y">
        <e><p><l></l><r>y</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_v">
        <e><p><l>v</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_k">
        <e><p><l>k</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_k">
        <e><p><l></l><r>k</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_kR">
        <e><p><l></l><r>kR</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_g_G">
        <e><p><l>G</l><r>g</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_f_F">
        <e><p><l>F</l><r>f</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_f">
        <e><p><l>f</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_M_F">
        <e><p><l>F</l><r>M</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_M">
        <e><p><l></l><r>M</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_m">
        <e><p><l></l><r>m</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_F">
        <e><p><l></l><r>F</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_R">
        <e><p><l></l><r>R</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_h">
        <e><p><l></l><r>h</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- PRAYOGAS -->

    <pardef n="pr_karwari">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pr_karmaNi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karmaNi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- GANAS -->

    <pardef n="ga_BvAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="BvAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_axAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="axAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_juhowyAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="juhowyAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_xivAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="xivAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_svAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="svAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_wuxAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="wuxAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_ruXAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ruXAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_wanAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="wanAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_kryAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="kryAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ga_curAxi">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="curAxi"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SUFFIXES -->

    <!-- === lat === -->

    <pardef n="la_lat_P_a">
        <e><p><l>awi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="11"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>awaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="12"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anwi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="13"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>asi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="21"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aWaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="22"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aWa</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="23"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ami</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="31"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AvaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="32"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>AmaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="33"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_P_uv">
        <e><p><l>owi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="11"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>uwaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="12"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vanwi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="13"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>oRi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="21"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>uWaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="22"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>uWa</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="23"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>omi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="31"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>uvaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="32"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>umaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="33"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_P_u">
        <e><par n="la_lat_P_uv"/></e>
        <e><p><l>vaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="32"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>maH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="33"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_P_nu_ac">
        <e><p><l>nowi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="11"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuwaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="12"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nvanwi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="13"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>noRi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="21"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuWaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="22"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuWa</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="23"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nomi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="31"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuvaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="32"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nvaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="32"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>numaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="33"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nmaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="33"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lat_P_nu_hal">
        <e><p><l>nowi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="11"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuwaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="12"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuvanwi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="13"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>noRi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="21"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuWaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="22"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuWa</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="23"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nomi</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="31"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nuvaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="32"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>numaH</l><r><s n="verb"/><s n="karwari"/><s n="lat"/><s n="33"/><s n="PP"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="hamm1"><i>ha</i><par n="md_m"/><i>m</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lot_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="hamm1"><par n="at_a"/><i>ha</i><par n="md_m"/><i>m</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_laf_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="lut3"><i>lu</i><par n="ma_N"/><i>t</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="sUrkRy1"><i>sUrkR</i><par n="md_y"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Sucy1"><i>Suc</i><par n="md_y"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="hary1"><i>har</i><par n="md_y"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Xav1"><i>Xa</i><par n="ma_n"/><i>v</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Xras1"><par n="at_O"/><par n="ma_u"/><i>Xras</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_laf_yak_kryAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="luj1"><i>lu</i><par n="ma_F"/><i>j</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_curAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="wub2"><i>wu</i><par n="ma_m"/><i>b</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_curAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="mah3"><i>ma</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>h</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lat_yak_curAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="gA1"><par n="at_a"/><i>gA</i><par n="ma_y"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="pA2"><par n="at_a"/><i>pA</i><par n="ma_y"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_axAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="hA1"><par n="at_a"/><i>hA</i><par n="ma_y"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_juhowyAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="prI3"><i>prI</i><par n="ma_N"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="bix1"><i>bi</i><par n="ma_n"/><i>x</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="mak1"><i>ma</i><par n="ma_f"/><i>k</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="RkaB1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>ka</i><par n="ma_m"/><i>B</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="gqh1"><par n="mr_g_G"/><i>q</i><par n="mr_h_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="akR1"><i>a</i><par n="md_k"/><i>R</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="wakR1"><i>wa</i><par n="md_k"/><i>R</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="wakR1"><i>wak</i><par n="md_R"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="wvakR1"><i>wva</i><par n="md_k"/><i>R</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="wvakR1"><par n="at_a"/><i>wvak</i><par n="md_R"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_BvAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="kRaj1"><i>kRa</i><par n="ma_F"/><i>j</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="guh1"><par n="mr_g_G"/><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_h_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_BvAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="xruh1"><i>xr</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="md_h"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_D"/></e>
    <e lm="swqh1"><i>sw</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="md_h"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_D"/></e>
    <e lm="Xras1"><par n="ma_u"/><i>Xras</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="Xras1"><par n="ma_u"/><i>Xras</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="vad2"><i>va</i><par n="ma_N"/><i>d</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="cuv1"><i>cu</i><par n="ma_n"/><i>v</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="was2"><i>wa</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>s</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_curAxi_iw_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="BU1"><par n="ab_ba"/><i>BU</i><par n="ma_v"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vug1"><par n="ab_vu"/><i>vu</i><par n="ma_f"/><i>g</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="uC2"><i>u</i><par n="ma_F"/><i>C</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="ab1"><par n="ab_A"/><par n="ma_n"/><i>a</i><par n="ma_m"/><i>b</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="gqh1"><par n="ab_ja"/><par n="mr_g_G"/><i>q</i><par n="md_h"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_23_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="Nu1"><par n="ab_nu"/><par n="mr_N_n"/><par n="md_u"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="xyu1"><par n="ab_xu"/><i>xy</i><par n="md_u"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="as2"><par n="ab_ba"/><p><l>BU</l><r>as</r></p><par n="ma_v"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="gu2"><par n="ab_ju"/><i>g</i><par n="md_u"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="xah2"><i>xa</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>h</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_curAxi_Am"/></e>
